Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1908
Confirmation of redemption.

If after trial as an action in equity the court finds: (1) That the petition provided for in section 76-1906 is filed in good faith and not for delay; (2) that the statements contained in the petition are true; and (3) that the requested redemption will not unreasonably affect the market value of the protected real estate exclusive of the redemptive homestead, then the court shall confirm the redemption.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 10.